Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.130

Fund created.

There is created in each city subject to the provisions of this chapter a police relief and pension fund. The fund shall be constituted as follows:

A sum equal to six percent thereof shall be deducted monthly from the salary of each police officer by the city treasurer and placed in the fund, but the maximum deduction shall not exceed six percent of the monthly salary of captain.

At the time the annual tax levy of the city is made, the city council, or other legislative body, shall order the transfer of an amount of money into the fund, sufficient with the salary deductions, to meet the financial requirements thereof:

(1) From moneys collected or received from all licenses issued;

(2) From fines and forfeitures collected or received in money for violation of city ordinances.

[ 1959 c 78 s 8; 1955 c 69 s 8; 1933 c 30 s 1; 1929 c 101 s 3; 1923 c 54 s 1; 1915 c 40 s 1; 1909 c 39 s 3; RRS s 9581.]